New York, session 2025-2026, S10468.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 109 of the domestic relations law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 8 to read as follows: 3 8. "Confirmatory adoption" shall mean an adoption of a child by an 4 existing legal parent pursuant to title five of this article. 5 § 2. Article 7 of the domestic relations law is amended by adding a 6 new title 5 to read as follows: 7 TITLE V 8 CONFIRMATORY ADOPTIONS 9 Section 119. Purpose of title. 10 119-a. Eligibility to file for confirmatory adoption. 11 119-b. Procedure on application for confirmatory adoption. 12 119-c. Multi-parent adoption. 13 § 119. Purpose of title. The purpose of this title is to create a 14 streamlined adoption process for a child's parents to confirm their 15 parent-child relationship through an adoption in order to protect the 16 child's best interests. Such adoption process shall ensure all parents 17 are afforded full rights and protections equivalent to that of biolog- 18 ical parents, especially for children conceived through assisted reprod- 19 uction. 20 § 119-a. Eligibility to file for confirmatory adoption. 1. Parents of 21 a child may file a joint petition for a confirmatory adoption to confirm 22 their parentage. Those eligible include the child's intended parents as 23 defined in section 581-102 of the family court act and the current or 24 former spouse of a birthing parent, provided that the person is named on 25 the child's birth certificate as a parent. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01942-01-5 S. 10468 2 1 2. All living parents of a child seeking to file for confirmatory 2 adoption pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall jointly file 3 a petition for a judgment of adoption with the court and include: 4 (a) proof of marriage between the petitioners, entered into prior to 5 the birth of the child; or 6 (b) a government-issued birth certificate listing petitioners as 7 parents of the child. 8 § 119-b. Procedure on application for confirmatory adoption. 1. Along 9 with the complaint for a final judgment of adoption, an individual or 10 individuals seeking adoption shall file a petition with the court certi- 11 fying the following: 12 (a) the applicant's name or applicants' names, residential address and 13 telephone number; 14 (b) a statement by the applicant or applicants that they are seeking 15 certification by the court as a person or persons qualified to adopt the 16 child to whom they are already a legal parent; 17 (c) a statement by the applicant or applicants that all the child's 18 living parent's consent to the confirmatory adoption; and 19 (d) a written declaration signed by all parties to the action that 20 describes in sufficient detail how the child was conceived and identi- 21 fies any other involved parties so that the court may determine whether 22 those individuals have parental rights to the child. 23 2. The court shall issue a judgment of adoption confirming parties to 24 the action as the legal parents of the child without the need for an 25 appearance by the parties. 26 3. If there are any other individuals with a claim to parentage, the 27 court may determine if the parental rights of that individual have been 28 relinquished or terminated and proceed without a hearing pursuant to 29 subdivision two of this section. 30 4. The court shall, if it determines that another individual may have 31 existing parental rights to the child, order and conduct a hearing on 32 the matter, provided notice is given to all parties of the action, 33 before issuing a judgment of adoption. If the court finds there is a 34 competing claim of parentage and all parties do not consent to such 35 claim, the court shall dismiss the petition without prejudice and the 36 parties may refile their adoption petition pursuant to section one 37 hundred fifteen of this article. 38 5. The court filing fees and other certification, investigation, and 39 criminal background check requirements for private-placement adoptions 40 pursuant to section one hundred fifteen-d or one hundred sixteen of this 41 article shall not apply. 42 6. Nothing in this title shall be deemed to summarily extinguish or 43 terminate the parental rights of any individual. 44 7. The chief administrator of the court shall promulgate the necessary 45 rules to effectuate the provisions of this title. 46 § 119-c. Multi-parent adoption. 1. The termination of the parental 47 duties and responsibilities of an existing parent or parents pursuant to 48 section one hundred eleven of this article may be waived if both the 49 existing parent or parents and the prospective adoptive parent or 50 parents consent to such waiver in writing at any time prior to the 51 finalization of the adoption. Such written consent shall be filed with 52 the court. 53 2. After receipt of the waiver pursuant to subdivision one of this 54 section, if the prospective adoptive parent has already been recognized 55 to be one of more than two legal parents of the child, the court may S. 10468 3 1 proceed with the confirmatory adoptive process pursuant to section one 2 hundred nineteen-b of this title. 3 § 3. The family court act is amended by adding a new article 5-D to 4 read as follows: 5 ARTICLE 5-D 6 PRESUMPTION OF PARENTAGE 7 PART 1. General provisions (582-101) 8 2. De facto parent (582-102 - 582-104) 9 3. Court adjudication of parentage for a child with multiple 10 parents (582-105 - 582-106) 11 PART 1 12 GENERAL PROVISIONS 13 Section 582-101. Presumption of parentage. 14 § 582-101. Presumption of parentage. (a) An individual is presumed to 15 be a parent of a child if, except as otherwise provided under section 16 581-406 of this chapter, the individual and the person who gave birth to 17 the child: 18 (1) are married to each other and the child is born during the 19 marriage, whether the marriage is or could be declared invalid; 20 (2) are married to each other and the child is born no later than 21 three hundred days after the marriage is terminated by death, divorce, 22 dissolution, annulment, or declaration of invalidity, or after a decree 23 of separation or separate maintenance, whether the marriage is or could 24 be declared invalid; or 25 (3) have married each other after the birth of the child, whether the 26 marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the individual at any time 27 asserted parentage of the child and: 28 (i) the assertion is in a record filed with a state agency maintaining 29 birth records; 30 (ii) the individual agreed to be and is named as a parent of the child 31 on the birth certificate of the child; or 32 (iii) the individual resided in the same household with the child and 33 openly held out the child as the individual's own child from the time 34 the child was born or adopted and for a period of at least two years 35 thereafter, including any period of temporary absence. 36 (b) A presumption of parentage under this section may be overcome, and 37 competing claims to parentage may be resolved, only by an adjudication 38 under section 582-105 of this article. 39 PART 2 40 DE FACTO PARENT 41 Section 582-102. Definitions. 42 582-103. Eligibility for a de facto parent to file for a judg- 43 ment of parentage. 44 582-104. Procedure for a de facto parent to file for a judgment 45 of parentage. 46 § 582-102. Definitions. As used in this article, the following terms 47 shall have the following meanings: 48 (a) "Parentage" means the continuing relationship between a child and 49 their parents, which can be shared, in certain circumstances, by more 50 than two parents, each having a degree of responsibility. 51 (b) "De facto parent" means a person who exercised parental responsi- 52 bility for the child and acted in a parental role from birth, or for at 53 least one year, to have established a bonded and dependent relationship 54 with the child that is parental in nature. S. 10468 4 1 § 582-103. Eligibility for a de facto parent to file for a judgment of 2 parentage. (a) In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a person who 3 claims to be a de facto parent of the child, if there is only one other 4 person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child, the 5 court shall adjudicate the petitioner to be a parent of the child if the 6 person demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that: 7 (1) The person resided with the child as a regular member of the 8 child's household from the child's birth, or for at least one year, 9 unless the court finds good cause to accept a shorter period of resi- 10 dence as a regular member of the child's household; 11 (2) The person engaged in consistent caretaking of the child which may 12 include regularly caring for the child's needs and making day-to-day 13 decisions regarding the child individually or cooperatively with another 14 legal parent; 15 (3) The person undertook full and permanent responsibilities of a 16 parent of the child without expectation of financial compensation; 17 (4) The person held out the child as their own; 18 (5) Another person consented to, and fostered, the petitioner's forma- 19 tion and establishment of a parent-like relationship with the child; 20 (6) The person established a bonded and dependent relationship with 21 the child that is parental in nature; and 22 (7) Continuing the relationship between the person and the child is in 23 the best interest of the child. 24 (b) In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a person who claims to 25 be a de facto parent of the child, if there is more than one other 26 person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child and the 27 court determines that the requirements of this section and section 582- 28 106 of this article are satisfied, the court shall award parentage to 29 the person claiming to be a de facto parent, provided the adjudication 30 of a person as a parent under this section shall not disestablish the 31 parentage of any other parent, nor limit any other parent's rights 32 pursuant to any other law of the state. 33 (c) An existing parent of the child may use evidence of duress, coer- 34 cion or threat of harm to contest an allegation that the person seeking 35 to be adjudicated as a parent fostered or supported a bonded and depend- 36 ent relationship as described in this section. Such evidence may 37 include: 38 (1) Whether within a ten-year period preceding the date of the 39 proceeding, the person seeking to be adjudicated as a de facto parent: 40 (i) has been convicted of domestic assault, sexual assault or sexual 41 exploitation of the child or a parent of the child; 42 (ii) has been convicted of a family violence crime, as defined by 43 title O of the penal law, and is or has been subject to an order of 44 protection issued by a family court; or 45 (iii) was found by a court to have committed abuse against the child 46 or a parent of the child; 47 (2) A sworn affidavit from a domestic violence counselor or sexual 48 assault counselor, provided the person who had confidential communi- 49 cations with the domestic violence counselor or sexual assault counselor 50 has waived the privilege; or 51 (3) Other credible evidence of abuse against the parent of the child 52 or the child, including, but not limited to, the parent's or child's 53 sworn affidavit or an affidavit from a social services provider, health 54 care provider, clergy person, attorney, or other professional from whom 55 the parent or child sought assistance regarding the abuse. S. 10468 5 1 § 582-104. Procedure for a de facto parent to file for a judgment of 2 parentage. (a) A proceeding to establish parentage of a child pursuant 3 to this article may be commenced by a person who: 4 (1) Is alive when the proceeding is commenced; and 5 (2) Claims to be a de facto parent of the child; or 6 (3) Claims to be the child of a de facto parent. 7 (b) A person seeking to be adjudicated as a parent of a child shall 8 file a petition with the court before the child reaches eighteen years 9 of age. The child is required to be alive at the time of the filing. 10 The petition shall include a verified affidavit alleging facts to 11 support the existence of a de facto parent relationship with the child. 12 The petition and affidavit shall be served on the following: all parents 13 of the child; the child; the child's legal guardian if the child is 14 under eighteen years of age; and, any other necessary party to the 15 proceeding. 16 (c) An adverse party, parent or legal guardian may file a pleading and 17 verified affidavit in response to the petition that shall be served on 18 all parties to the proceeding. 19 (d) The court shall determine on the basis of the pleadings and affi- 20 davits whether the person seeking to be adjudicated a parent has 21 presented prima facie evidence of the criteria for parentage pursuant to 22 subdivision (a) of section 582-103 of this part and, therefore, has 23 standing to proceed with a parentage action. The court, in its sole 24 discretion, may hold a hearing to determine disputed facts that are 25 necessary and material to the issue of standing. 26 (e) If the child for whom the person is seeking to be adjudicated a 27 parent has two parents at the time the petition is filed and there is 28 litigation pending between the parents at the time the petition is filed 29 regarding custody or visitation with respect to the child, a parent may 30 introduce evidence that the de facto parent action is being brought to 31 interfere improperly in the pending litigation. Based on such evidence, 32 the court may determine that allowing the de facto parent's petition for 33 judgment of parentage to proceed would not be in the best interests of 34 the child and may dismiss the petition without prejudice. 35 (f) The court may enter an interim order concerning contact between 36 the child and a person with standing seeking adjudication under section 37 582-103 of this part as a parent of the child. 38 (g) Any person adjudicated to be a de facto parent of a child under 39 this section shall have all the legal rights and responsibilities of 40 parentage under New York law, including the obligation to support the 41 child. 42 PART 3 43 COURT ADJUDICATION OF PARENTAGE FOR A CHILD WITH MULTIPLE PARENTS 44 Section 582-105. Adjudicating competing claims of parentage. 45 582-106. Judgment of parentage for a child with multiple 46 parents. 47 § 582-105. Adjudicating competing claims of parentage. (a) In a proceed- 48 ing to adjudicate competing claims of parentage of a child by two or 49 more individuals, the court shall adjudicate parentage in the best 50 interest of the child, based on: 51 (1) the age of the child; 52 (2) the length of time during which each individual assumed the role 53 of parent of the child; 54 (3) the nature of the relationship between the child and each individ- 55 ual; S. 10468 6 1 (4) the harm to the child if the relationship between the child and 2 each individual is not recognized; 3 (5) the basis for each individual's claim to parentage of the child; 4 and 5 (6) other equitable factors arising from the disruption of the 6 relationship between the child and each individual or the likelihood of 7 other harm to the child. 8 (b) The interest that a child may have in forming a relationship with 9 a genetic parent shall not be given conclusive weight in adjudicating 10 competing claims of parentage, particularly when there is no preexisting 11 substantial relationship between the genetic parent and the child. 12 (c) In a proceeding to adjudicate parentage of a person who claims to 13 be a de facto parent of the child, if there is more than one other 14 person who is a parent or has a claim to parentage of the child and the 15 court determines that the requirements of this section and section 582- 16 103 of this article are satisfied, the court shall award parentage to 17 the person claiming to be a de facto parent, provided the adjudication 18 of a person as a parent under this section shall not disestablish the 19 parentage of any other parent, nor limit any other parent's rights under 20 the laws of this state. 21 § 582-106. Judgment of parentage for a child with multiple parents. 22 The court may adjudicate a child to have more than two parents if the 23 court finds that failure to recognize more than two parents would be 24 detrimental to the child. A finding of detriment to the child shall not 25 require a finding of unfitness of any parent or person seeking an adju- 26 dication of parentage. In determining detriment to the child, the court 27 shall consider all relevant factors, including: 28 (a) The harm if the child is removed from a stable placement with a 29 person who has fulfilled the child's physical needs and psychological 30 needs for care and affection and has assumed the role since the child's 31 birth or for a substantial period; 32 (b) The harm if the child is separated from a person the child under- 33 stands to be their parent; and 34 (c) The intention of all parents to raise a child together, including 35 a pre-conception agreement to parent or agreement to parent at any other 36 point in the child's life. 37 § 4. Subdivision (a) of section 70 of the domestic relations law, as 38 amended by chapter 457 of the laws of 1988, is amended to read as 39 follows: 40 (a) Where a minor child is residing within this state, [either] any 41 parent may apply to the supreme court for a writ of habeas corpus to 42 have such minor child brought before such court; and on the return ther- 43 eof, the court, on due consideration, may award the natural guardian- 44 ship, charge and custody of such child to [either] any parent for such 45 time, under such regulations and restrictions, and with such provisions 46 and directions, as the case may require, and may at any time thereafter 47 vacate or modify such order. In all cases there shall be no prima facie 48 right to the custody of the child in [either] any parent, but the court 49 shall determine solely what is for the best interest of the child, and 50 what will best promote its welfare and happiness, and make award accord- 51 ingly. Where a court deems it to be in the child's best interest, the 52 court may award custody to more than two parents. 53 § 5. Subparagraphs 2 and 4 of paragraph (a), clause (vi) of subpara- 54 graph 5 of paragraph (c), subparagraphs 6 and 7 of paragraph (f) and 55 paragraphs (g), (i) and (j) of subdivision 1 and paragraph a and the 56 opening paragraph and subparagraph 1 of paragraph b of subdivision 3 of S. 10468 7 1 section 413 of the family court act, subparagraphs 2 and 4 of paragraph 2 (a) and subparagraphs 6 and 7 of paragraph (f) of subdivision 1 as 3 amended by chapter 567 of the laws of 1989, clause (vi) of subparagraph 4 5 of paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 as added by chapter 215 of the laws 5 of 2009, paragraphs (g) and (i) of subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 6 436 of the laws of 2011, paragraph (j) of subdivision 1 as amended by 7 chapter 59 of the laws of 1993, and paragraph a and the opening para- 8 graph and subparagraph 1 of paragraph b of subdivision 3 as amended by 9 chapter 398 of the laws of 1997, are amended to read as follows: 10 (2) "Child support" shall mean a sum to be paid pursuant to court 11 order or decree by [either or both parents] one or more parent or pursu- 12 ant to a valid agreement between the parties for care, maintenance and 13 education of any unemancipated child under the age of twenty-one years. 14 (4) "Combined parental income" shall mean the sum of the income of 15 [both] all parents. 16 (vi) Upon proof by [either] any party that cash medical support pursu- 17 ant to clause (ii), (iii), (iv) or (v) of this subparagraph would be 18 unjust or inappropriate pursuant to paragraph (f) of this subdivision 19 [one of this section], the court shall: 20 (6) The educational needs of [either] any parent; 21 (7) A determination that the gross income of one or more parent is 22 substantially less than [the other] one or more of another parent's 23 gross income; 24 (g) Where the court finds that the non-custodial parent's pro rata 25 share of the basic child support obligation is unjust or inappropriate, 26 the court shall order the non-custodial parent to pay such amount of 27 child support as the court finds just and appropriate, and the court 28 shall set forth, in a written order, the factors it considered; the 29 amount of each party's pro rata share of the basic child support obli- 30 gation; and the reasons that the court did not order the basic child 31 support obligation. Such written order may not be waived by [either] any 32 party or counsel; provided, however, and notwithstanding any other 33 provision of law, including but not limited to section four hundred 34 fifteen of this part, the court shall not find that the non-custodial 35 parent's pro rata share of such obligation is unjust or inappropriate on 36 the basis that such share exceeds the portion of a public assistance 37 grant which is attributable to a child or children. Where the non-custo- 38 dial parent's income is less than or equal to the poverty income guide- 39 lines amount for a single person as reported by the federal department 40 of health and human services, unpaid child support arrears in excess of 41 five hundred dollars shall not accrue. 42 (i) Where [either or both] any of the parties are unrepresented, the 43 court shall not enter an order or judgment other than a temporary order 44 pursuant to section two hundred thirty-seven of the domestic relations 45 law, that includes a provision for child support unless the unrepre- 46 sented party or parties have received a copy of the child support stand- 47 ards chart promulgated by the commissioner of the office of temporary 48 and disability assistance pursuant to subdivision two of section one 49 hundred eleven-i of the social services law. Where [either] any party is 50 in receipt of child support enforcement services through the local 51 social services district, the local social services district child 52 support enforcement unit shall advise such party of the amount derived 53 from application of the child support percentage and that such amount 54 serves as a starting point for the determination of the child support 55 award, and shall provide such party with a copy of the child support 56 standards chart. S. 10468 8 1 (j) In addition to financial disclosure required in section four 2 hundred twenty-four-a of this article, the court may require that the 3 income and/or expenses of [either] any party be verified with documenta- 4 tion including, but not limited to, past and present income tax returns, 5 employer statements, pay stubs, corporate, business, or partnership 6 books and records, corporate and business tax returns, and receipts for 7 expenses or such other means of verification as the court determines 8 appropriate. Nothing herein shall affect any party's right to pursue 9 discovery pursuant to this chapter, the civil practice law and rules, or 10 the family court act. 11 a. One-time adjustment of child support orders issued prior to Septem- 12 ber fifteenth, nineteen hundred eighty-nine. Any party to a child 13 support order issued prior to September fifteenth, nineteen hundred 14 eighty-nine on the behalf of a child in receipt of public assistance or 15 child support services pursuant to section one hundred eleven-g of the 16 social services law may request that the support collection unit under- 17 take one review of the order for adjustment purposes pursuant to section 18 one hundred eleven-h of the social services law. A hearing on the 19 adjustment of such order shall be granted upon the objection of [either] 20 any party pursuant to the provisions of this section. An order shall be 21 adjusted if as of the date of the support collection unit's review of 22 the correct amount of child support as calculated pursuant to the 23 provisions of this section would deviate by at least ten percent from 24 the child support ordered in the last permanent support order of the 25 court. Additionally, a new support order shall be issued upon a showing 26 that the current order of support does not provide for the health care 27 needs of the child through insurance or otherwise. Eligibility of the 28 child for medical assistance shall not relieve any obligation the 29 parties otherwise have to provide for the health care needs of the 30 child. The support collection unit's review of a child support order 31 shall be made on notice to all parties to the current support order and 32 shall be subject to the provisions of section four hundred twenty-four-a 33 of this article. Nothing herein shall be deemed in any way to limit, 34 restrict, expand or impair the rights of any party to file for a modifi- 35 cation of a child support order as is otherwise provided by law. 36 Upon receipt of an adjustment finding and where appropriate a proposed 37 order in conformity with such finding filed by [either] any party or by 38 the support collection unit, a party shall have thirty-five days from 39 the date of mailing of the adjustment finding and proposed adjusted 40 order, if any, to submit to the court identified thereon specific writ- 41 ten objections to such finding and proposed order. 42 (1) If specific written objections are submitted by [either] any party 43 or by the support collection unit, a hearing shall be scheduled by the 44 court on notice to the parties and the support collection unit, who 45 shall have the right to be heard by the court and to offer evidence in 46 support of or in opposition to adjustment of the support order. 47 § 6. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 48 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 49 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 50 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 51 on or before such effective date.